Utah statutes.
78B-15-110.   Duty of attorney general and county attorney.

Whenever the state commences an action under this chapter, it shall be the duty of the attorney general or the county attorney of the county where the obligee resides to represent the state.  Neither the attorney general nor the county attorney represents or has an attorney-client relationship with the obligee or the obligor in carrying out his responsibilities under this chapter.

